Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1137.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6111.1(e)(1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6111.1. Pennsylvania State Police.* * *(e) Challenge to records.--(1) Any person who is denied the right to receive, sell, transfer, possess, carry, manufacture or purchase a firearm as a result of the procedures established by this section:(i) may challenge the accuracy of that person's criminal history, juvenile delinquency history or mental health record pursuant to a denial by the instantaneous records check by submitting a challenge to the Pennsylvania State Police within 30 days from the date of 123456789101112131415161718 the denial[.]; and(ii) shall, upon written application to the agency head or the presiding officer pursuant to 1 Pa. Code § 35.142 (relating to subpoenas) by the person or the person's attorney, be issued subpoenas for the production of documentary evidence supporting the review of the accuracy of any information that may form the basis for the denial.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1137PN1374 - 2 - 12345678910